Arkansas, session 2025, SB36.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
established for the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult,
and Behavioral Health Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N221N ARKANSAS STATE HOSPITAL COO 1 GRADE SE03
(2) N220N DHS CHIEF ATTORNEY 1 GRADE SE02
(3) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
*LCW020*
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(4) N027N DHS DEPUTY DIRECTOR ADULT SERVICES 1 GRADE SE01
(5) L011N DENTIST 1 GRADE MP06
(6) L009N DHS BEHAV HLTH GENERAL PHYSICIAN 3 GRADE MP06
(7) L014N DIRECTOR OF PHARMACY 1 GRADE MP06
(8) L013N GENERAL PHYSICIAN 1 GRADE MP06
(9) L016N REGISTERED PHARMACIST 4 GRADE MP05
(10) L105C AHC NURSING DIRECTOR 1 GRADE MP04
(11) L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE MP04
(12) L006C ASSOCIATE DIRECTOR OF NURSING 3 GRADE MP03
(13) L009C NURSE MANAGER 11 GRADE MP03
(14) L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 4 GRADE MP03
(15) L015C CLINICAL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP02
(16) L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 1 GRADE MP02
(17) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 30 GRADE MP02
(18) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 125 GRADE MP01
(19) L032C REGISTERED NURSE - HOSPITAL 28 GRADE MP01
(20) G283C DHS CHIEF SECURITY & COMPLIANCE OFCR 1 GRADE GS15
(21) N103N DHS MENTAL HEALTH CENTER DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(22) N124N DHS/DYS ASSISTANT DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(23) M002C DHS BEHAV HLTH ASSOC DIR, AHC 1 GRADE GS13
(24) M003C DHS BEHAV HLTH CHILDRENS SYSTEM CARE DIR 1 GRADE GS13
(25) G277C DHS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(26) N127N DHS/DBHS DIR ALCOHOL & DRUG ABUSE PREV 1 GRADE GS13
(27) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(28) G101C DHS AREA MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(29) N152N DHS/DBHS ASSISTANT DIR ADMIN SVCS 1 GRADE GS12
(30) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(31) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(32) L011C DHS ALCOHOL/DRUG ABUSE PREV ASST DEP DIR 3 GRADE GS11
(33) G027N DHS RESEARCH ANALYSIS MANAGER 2 GRADE GS11
(34) N153N DHS/DBHS CLINICAL DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(35) G008C RISK MANAGEMENT ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(36) G076C ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS10
(37) L010C DHS DMS MEDICAL ASSISTANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS10
(38) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 13 GRADE GS09
(39) L040C DIETARY SERVICES DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS09
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(40) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS09
(41) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 27 GRADE GS09
(42) L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER 1 GRADE GS09
(43) E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER 1 GRADE GS08
(44) L050C CERTIFIED RESPIRATORY THERAPY TECH 4 GRADE GS08
(45) T031C DHS BEHAV HLTH PUBLIC SAFETY DIR 1 GRADE GS08
(46) M016C DHS FIELD MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(47) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 11 GRADE GS08
(48) G083C DHS/DAAS DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(49) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(50) M010C FAMILY SERVICE WORKER CLINICAL SPEC 1 GRADE GS08
(51) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(52) M018C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR II 1 GRADE GS08
(53) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(54) S008C CAMPUS MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(55) G131C DHS BEHAV HLTH MED BUS PRACTICES ADM 1 GRADE GS07
(56) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 23 GRADE GS07
(57) G153C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(58) L055C DIETICIAN 1 GRADE GS07
(59) L062C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE SUPERVISOR 12 GRADE GS07
(60) M026C LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER 5 GRADE GS07
(61) P020C PRODUCTION ARTIST 1 GRADE GS07
(62) M025C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY COORDINATOR I 1 GRADE GS07
(63) L052C REHAB FACILITY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS07
(64) A072C RESEARCH & STATISTICS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(65) A063C RESEARCH & STATISTICS SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(65.1) M023C SUBSTANCE ABUSE PROGRAM COORD 1 GRADE GS07
(66) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 14 GRADE GS06
(67) M045C ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES WORKER 39 GRADE GS06
(68) E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER 3 GRADE GS06
(69) L044C DHS BEHAV HLTH CASE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(70) G184C DHS PROGRAM CONSULTANT 2 GRADE GS06
(71) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS06
(72) G198C DHS/DAAS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS06
(73) T052C DHS/DBHS PUBLIC SAFETY SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(74) G180C GRANTS ANALYST 4 GRADE GS06
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(75) X101C INTERNAL AFFAIRS INVESTIGATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(76) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(77) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 93 GRADE GS06
(78) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(79) G124C OMBUDSMAN 1 GRADE GS06
(80) G178C POLICY DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(81) M066C PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS06
(82) L103C PSYCHOLOGICAL EVALUATOR 3 GRADE GS06
(83) X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER 1 GRADE GS06
(84) C026C RECORDS/INTAKE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(85) L051C REHABILITATION COUNSELOR 1 GRADE GS06
(86) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(87) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 9 GRADE GS06
(88) G202C VOLUNTEER PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(89) S021C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT SUPV 1 GRADE GS06
(89.1) RO27C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(89.2) L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(90) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(91) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS05
(92) S041C BOILER OPERATOR 4 GRADE GS05
(93) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(94) C030C HEALTH RECORDS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(95) D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(96) T055C PUBLIC SAFETY OFFICER 20 GRADE GS05
(97) M065C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS05
(98) L066C REHABILITATION INSTRUCTOR 35 GRADE GS05
(99) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 25 GRADE GS05
(100) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS05
(101) S030C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT OPER 2 GRADE GS05
(102) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 39 GRADE GS04
(103) X167C COMPLAINTS INVESTIGATOR 1 GRADE GS04
(104) L102C DIETETIC SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(105) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(106) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 2 GRADE GS04
(107) R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
(108) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 3 GRADE GS04
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(109) B111C LABORATORY TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS04
(110) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 4 GRADE GS04
(111) T072C SECURITY OFFICER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(112) V023C STOREROOM SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(113) L074C THERAPY ASSISTANT 2 GRADE GS04
(114) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(115) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 5 GRADE GS03
(116) M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE 75 GRADE GS03
(117) L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT 153 GRADE GS03
(118) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 8 GRADE GS03
(119) S067C HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(120) S076C INSTITUTIONAL BEAUTICIAN 1 GRADE GS03
(121) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE GS03
(122) C074C MEDICAL RECORDS ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS03
(123) T084C PUBLIC SAFETY SECURITY OFFICER 60 GRADE GS03
(124) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 5 GRADE GS02
(125) S070C EQUIPMENT TECHNICIAN 4 GRADE GS02
(126) S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST 9 GRADE GS02
(127) S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS02
(128) S066C LANDSCAPE TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS02
(129) M076C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY LEADER II 20 GRADE GS02
(130) V030C SHIPPING & RECEIVING CLERK 1 GRADE GS02
(131) E056C TEACHER ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS02
(132) V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER 2 GRADE GS02
(133) S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN 29 GRADE GS01
(134) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 48 GRADE GS01
(135) L086C PHARMACY ASSISTANT 2 GRADE GS01
(136) M082C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY LEADER I 2 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,179

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following
maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra
Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: three
hundred forty-seven (347) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services
- Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $58,451,995
(02) EXTRA HELP 5,764,305
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 24,682,047
(04) OVERTIME 5,712,006
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 41,332,158
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 182,214
(C) PROF. FEES 11,460,828
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 900,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $148,485,553

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - AGING AND ADULT SERVICES - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be
payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses, grants, and programs for aging and adult
services of the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NURSING HOME CARE ALTERNATIVES $4,802,025
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(02) NUTRITION PROGRAMS 22,790,328
(03) OLDER WORKER PROGRAM 1,052,665
(04) PROJECT GRANTS 17,436,641
(05) RETIRED & SENIOR VOLUNTEER PROGRAM 75,000
(06) SENIOR CITIZEN CENTERS 10,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $56,156,659

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - COMMUNITY ALCOHOL SAFETY OPERATIONS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable
from the Highway Safety Special Fund, for grant payments of the Department of
Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COMMUNITY ALCOHOL SAFETY GRANTS AND
AID $2,416,834

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - PATIENT BENEFITS - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for benefits of the patients of the Department of Human
Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PATIENT BENEFIT FUND $70,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
grant payments of the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging,
Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS AND AID $47,553,171

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE PREVENTION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from
the Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment Fund, for education, drug abuse
prevention, and treatment services of the Department of Human Services -
Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EDUCATION/PREVENTION/TREATMENT $49,666,991

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CRISIS SERVICES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Behavioral Health Services Fund Account, for grants and operating expenses
related to crisis intervention of the Department of Human Services - Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CRISIS SERVICES $5,000,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - VETERANS MENTAL HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be
payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for a grant program to veterans service organizations to support
veterans and their families by the Department of Human Services - Division of
Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(01) VETERANS MENTAL HEALTH GRANT PROGRAM $5,000,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - MEALS ON WHEELS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Aging and Adult Services Fund Account, for the Meals on Wheels Program and
transportation services for the elderly of the Department of Human Services -
Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) TRANSPORTATION SERVICES $2,400,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS SENIOR OLYMPICS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Behavioral Health Services Fund Account, for matching funds for the Arkansas
Senior Olympics of the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging,
Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATE MATCH $70,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - INDEPENDENT CHOICES GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
grant payments of the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging,
Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INDEPENDENT CHOICES GRANTS AND AID $400,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - FIGHT SENIOR HUNGER COMMUNITY GRANT MATCH
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Human Services,
to be payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for grant match payments of the Department of Human
Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FIGHT SENIOR HUNGER GRANT MATCH $400,000

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES. Pay rates for physicians and chief psychologists
within the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services may
include the special allowances available to UAMS physicians and professional
faculty as authorized in Arkansas Code. Part of the salaries of such staff
will come from the receipt of professional income in the care of patients
and/or funds received from federal agencies, foundations and other private
sponsors in the support of research. Provided that any such allowance shall
not exceed, for any employee, an amount equal to two and one half times the
salary authorized by the General Assembly. The specific Division of Aging,
Adult, and Behavioral Health Services classifications covered by this
language are:
Class
Code Title
L005N Psychiatric Specialist
L009N DHS Behavioral Health General Physician
L001C Psychologist Supervisor
Prior to these allowances being made available for an individual, they
will be approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and reviewed by the
Personnel Committee of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
HEALTH CENTER. (A) The Department of Human Services shall not close the
Arkansas Health Center that provides skilled nursing through specialized
services and programs.
(B) The Department of Human Services shall continue to accept clients for
whom it has determined that skilled nursing and specialized services are
needed at the Arkansas Health Center.
(C) No funds shall be transferred or reduced from the Arkansas Health
Center, except for use as federal matching funds, below the approved funding
level on March 1, 2003 without the prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or the Joint Budget Committee.
(D) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue
funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General
Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the
appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations
authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue
Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the
Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility
is provided to the Department of Human Services authorizing broad powers
under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the
General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section.
The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of
approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SPECIAL
RATES OF PAY AND EMPLOYMENT WORK DAYS. For employees hired on or after July
1, 2013, at the Arkansas State Hospital in the classifications listed below,
the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services Director shall
implement salary adjustments utilizing the approved pay grid for teachers
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
employed by the Arkansas Schools for the Blind and Deaf.
To achieve the salary adjustments, the Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services is authorized to pay special rates of pay for
classifications at the Arkansas State Hospital listed below:
Classification Title Grade
E035C Certified Masters Teacher GS08
E044C Certified Bachelors Teacher GS06
Funding for the minimum compensation provided for in this section that
is supported in whole or in part from general revenues, shall, if required,
be provided by a transfer from the Performance Fund to the proper fund or
fund account and in such amounts as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State. The Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services
shall in addition to the funds provided in this Act for Annual Career Service
Recognition Payments from the Performance Fund, make available any funding
generated from agency salary savings for such purposes from the funds or fund
accounts as provided by law.
For employees hired on or after July 1, 2013, at the Arkansas State
Hospital in the classifications listed above either a Certified Masters
Teacher or a Certified Bachelors Teacher, the Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services Director shall set the number of work days for the
employment year to equal the number of days worked by those employed in the
same classifications at the Arkansas Schools for the Blind and Deaf. The
accrual, use, and carryover of sick days, personal days, and holidays of the
employees at the Arkansas State Hospital that are hired on or after July 1,
2013, or current employees choosing to adopt this plan, shall be treated in
the same manner as those employed in the same classifications at the Arkansas
Schools for the Blind and Deaf.
Those currently employed at the Arkansas State Hospital in the
classifications listed above as of June 30, 2013, have the one-time option of
adopting this language or continuing to operate under the same salary, leave
and benefit plans they are currently receiving. Employees must make their
decision by June 30, 2013.
Accrued annual and holiday leave, up to 240 hours, as of June 30,
2013, will be paid out to current employees choosing to adopt this plan. Any
additional accrued annual and holiday leave will be forfeited. Accrued sick
leave, as of June 30, 2013, shall be retained on file and shall be exhausted
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
before any newly accrued sick leave may be taken.
All employees affected by this section shall be eligible to receive
hazardous duty pay for time worked in eligible areas.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD - COMMUNITY BASED CRISIS INTERVENTION CRISIS SERVICES. Any unexpended
balance of funds allocated for Community Based Crisis Intervention Crisis
Services in the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services from the Behavioral Health Services Fund Account
which remains at the close of each state fiscal year shall be carried forward
to the next state fiscal year to be used for the same intent and purposes as
set forth in law. Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as
authorized herein may be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2024 2025, the Agency shall, by written
statement, set forth its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding
to the Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission, or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward, the program name
or line item, the funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the
written request set forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission, or Institution shall provide a
written report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose, etc.
for which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty
(30) days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission, or Institution
presents its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
include all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
and/or a statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission, or
Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. AGING AND
ADULT SERVICES - MATCHING FUNDS. The funds appropriated for state match for
the Arkansas Senior Olympics Program in this Act shall be paid on a two-to-
one state/local matching basis. The Senior Arkansas Sports Organization must
certify its portion of the match to the Division of Aging, Adult, and
Behavioral Health Services before any funds appropriated for state match for
the Arkansas Senior Olympics Program in this Act are disbursed.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. AGING AND
ADULT SERVICES - NURSING HOME CARE ALTERNATIVES. Funding for "Nursing Home
Care Alternatives", as it appears in the Aging and Adult Services -
Operations appropriation may be used for home delivered meals, adult day
care, homemaker/chore, respite care, personal care, health promotion, and
other community-based activities. These funds may also be used to match
Medicaid community-based programs.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SENIOR
CITIZEN CENTERS. The appropriation in this act for Senior Citizen Centers
shall be distributed in the same manner as the funding formula requirements
set out in the federal Older Americans Act funding law. The additional
funding provided by this provision shall supplement and not supplant any
monies currently funding services for Senior Citizen Centers.
The requirements in this section shall only be implemented in accordance
with any necessary approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
and in the event that additional general revenue funding is provided by the
General Assembly for these purposes. Should additional funding provided for
these purposes be insufficient to provide for the increases in full, the
increases shall be provided to the extent that funding is made available.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 22. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRY
FORWARD OF UNOBLIGATED GENERAL REVENUE FUNDS FOR SENIOR CITIZEN CENTERS. (a)
On June 30, 2019, or as soon as is practicable to determine funds available
as authorized in this Section, and each fiscal year thereafter the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be transferred on his or her books
and those of the State Treasurer and Auditor of State the balance of
unobligated general revenue funds, excluding funds carried forward for other
purposes, remaining in the Fund or Fund Accounts and the corresponding paying
accounts as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, as set out
in subsection (b) herein, to the Department of Human Services - Division of
Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services paying account to be used
exclusively for the disbursement of funds for Senior Citizen Centers in the
amount of recouped and recovered general revenue not to exceed five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000).
(b) Any unobligated general revenue, excluding funds carried forward for
other purposes, remaining in the following Fund or Fund Accounts and the
corresponding paying accounts at the end of the Fiscal Year that would
normally be transferred into the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund as
recouped or recovered General Revenue shall be transferred as authorized in
subsection (a) herein:
(1) Department of Human Services Administration Fund Account;
(2) Children and Family Services Fund Account;
(3) Youth Services Fund Account;
(4) Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account;
(5) Medical Services Fund Account;
(6) Behavioral Health Services Fund Account;
(7) County Operations Fund Account; and
(8) Provider Services and Quality Assurance Fund Account.
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(c)(1) Any general revenue recouped or recovered as authorized in
subsections (a) and (b) herein shall be carried forward to the following
fiscal year for Senior Citizen Centers and shall be distributed in the same
manner as the funding formula requirements set out in the federal Older
Americans Act funding law.
(2) The additional funding provided by this provision shall supplement
and not supplant any monies currently funding services for Senior Citizen
Centers.
(d) Should additional funding provided for in subsections (a) and (b)
herein be insufficient to provide for the full five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) authorized, the increases shall be provided to the extent that
general revenue is recouped and carried forward.
(e)(1) The Department of Human Services shall provide a written report to
the Department of Finance and Administration Budget Office, the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee the total amount of general
revenue carried forward and distributed as set forth in this section no later
than thirty (30) days prior to the time the Department presents its budget
request to the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration shall include all
information obtained in subsection (e)(1) herein in the budget manual
submitted to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee for
the Department.

SECTION 23. SPECIAL LANGUAGE - CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code Title 20,
Subtitle 5, Chapter 76, is amended to add an additional subchapter to read as
follows:
Subchapter 9 — Fight Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program

20-76-901. Fight Senior Hunger Community Grant Match Program —
Creation — Definitions.
(a) There is created a grant program to be known as the "Fight Senior
Hunger Community Grant Match Program" to incentivize Arkansas counties,
cities, and nonprofit organizations to help fight senior hunger in their
respective communities.
(b) The Department of Human Services is authorized to award a grant to
a county, city, or nonprofit organization from funds provided if:
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
(1) The county, city, or nonprofit organization develops a
written plan for providing meals or food to senior citizens in its community
and submits the written plan to the Department of Human Services - Division
of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services for approval; and
(2) The members of the county quorum court, city council, or
nonprofit organization submits proof that, through either donations of money
or property in kind, citizens of the county or city, or persons associated
with the nonprofit organization, have pledged or will make available no less
than one-half (1/2) of the cost of the program.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, upon
the Department of Human Services - Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral
Health Services approval of compliance required by subdivision (b)(1) of this
section, the department may approve a state grant to be used for the benefit
of the county, city, or nonprofit organization program in an amount that
equals up to one-half (1/2) of the estimated program cost.
(2) The state's share of the county, city, or nonprofit
organization program shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization formed under
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as it existed on January 1,
2025; and
(2) "Property in kind" is limited to kitchen and dining space
operational costs that would be associated with the county, city, or
nonprofit organization's program.

20-76-902. Reporting.
Each Area Agency on Aging shall report on its active programs and
expenditures to address senior food insecurity under this subchapter to the:
(1) House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative
and Military Affairs at least one (1) time each year and during a legislative
session; and
(2) Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth at least one
(1) time each year during a legislative interim.

SECTION 24. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 S4/3/25 SB36
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 25. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 26. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee






04-03-2025 15:45:17 LCW020